Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1779
Withdrawals.

(1) Shares may be withdrawn for payment to the account holder or to third parties in the manner and in accordance with procedures established by the board of directors subject to any rules and regulations prescribed by the department.

(2) Share accounts shall be subject to any withdrawal notice requirement specified in the contract creating the account. In addition, a credit union may impose a thirty-day withdrawal notice on all accounts when it has not specifically waived this right if it notifies the department of such imposition and the reasons therefor.

(3) A membership share may not be redeemed or withdrawn except upon termination of membership in the credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 79.